test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-4lex_kiedavussam_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kieđâvuššâm: 
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Sg+Nom:  tiggekieđâvuššâm
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Sg+Gen:  tiggekieđâvuššâm
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Sg+Acc:  tiggekieđâvuššâm
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Sg+Ill:  tiggekieđâvušmân
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Sg+Loc:  tiggekieđâvušmist
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Sg+Com:  tiggekieđâvušmáin
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Sg+Abe:  tiggekieđâvuššâmttáá
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Ess:  tiggekieđâvušmin
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Par:  tiggekieđâvušmid
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Pl+Nom:  tiggekieđâvušmeh
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Pl+Gen:  tiggekieđâvušmij
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Pl+Acc:  tiggekieđâvušmijd
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Pl+Ill:  tiggekieđâvušmáid
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Pl+Loc:  tiggekieđâvušmijn
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Pl+Com:  [tiggekieđâvušmijguin, tiggekieđâvušmijgijn]
    tiggekieđâvuššâm+N+Pl+Abe:  tiggekieđâvušmijttáá
